New York, session 2025-2026, S8372.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 2 rule 4533-c to read as follows: 3 Rule 4533-c. Rebuttable presumption of expenses in matrimonial 4 actions. 1. This rule applies to all actions wherein all or part of the 5 relief sought is divorce, all actions brought in supreme court for 6 custody or visitation, all applications to modify a supreme court order 7 of custody or visitation, all actions wherein all or part of the relief 8 sought is the dissolution, annulment or declaration of the nullity of a 9 marriage, all proceedings to obtain a distribution of marital property 10 following a foreign judgment of divorce, and all post-judgment 11 proceedings following a judgment of divorce. 12 2. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in rule four thousand five 13 hundred thirty-three-a of this article, there shall be a rebuttable 14 presumption that an itemized bill or invoice, receipted or marked paid, 15 for court-ordered obligations, child related expenses, household 16 expenses, goods, services or repairs in an amount not in excess of ten 17 thousand dollars shall be admissible in evidence and establishes the 18 necessity of and represents the reasonable value of such expenses, 19 goods, services or repairs itemized therein in any action or proceeding 20 set forth in subdivision one of this rule, provided that it is accompa- 21 nied by an affirmation by the person, firm or corporation, or an author- 22 ized agent or employee thereof, providing such goods or services or 23 making such repairs and charging for the same, stating that (a) it 24 provided the goods or services or made the repairs for which the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09034-02-5 S. 8372 2 1 expenses were incurred in the amount indicated, (b) no part of the 2 payment received therefor will be refunded to the debtor, and (c) the 3 amounts itemized therein are the usual and customary rates charged for 4 such expenses, goods, services or repairs by the affiant or the 5 affiant's employer; and provided further that a true copy of such item- 6 ized bill or invoice together with a notice of intention to introduce 7 such bill or invoice into evidence pursuant to this rule, indicating on 8 its face that any objections must be in writing and set forth the basis 9 for such objection or objections, is served upon the adverse party no 10 later than thirty days prior to trial. Such presumption may be rebutted 11 at trial only if the adverse party has served on the party submitting 12 the bill or invoice and filed with the court a written notice of inten- 13 tion to rebut such bill or invoice setting forth the basis for such 14 objection or objections no later than fifteen days prior to trial. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law and shall apply to matrimonial actions commenced on or 17 after such date.